Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6911YC (1) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 808.17 Reverse-location warrant. 1 1. For purposes of this section: 2 a. âAnonymizedâ means identifying information connected 3 to an electronic device in a manner such that the subject, 4 including an individual, household, device, or internet 5 protocol address, is not identifiable to a law enforcement 6 agency. 7 b. âCell siteâ means transmission or reception equipment, 8 including a base-station antenna, that connects an electronic 9 device to a network. 10 c. âCell site recordâ means the cell site location 11 information of an electronic device that corresponds to a 12 specific cell site and time frame. 13 d. âElectronic deviceâ means a device that enables access 14 to or use of a location information service or can otherwise 15 create or provide location information. 16 e. âGeofenceâ means a specified geographic area defined by a 17 virtual perimeter or geographic coordinates. 18 f. âGovernment entityâ means a state or local agency, 19 including but not limited to a law enforcement entity or any 20 other investigative entity, agency, department, division, 21 bureau, board, or commission, or an individual or entity acting 22 or purporting to act for or on behalf of a state or local 23 agency. 24 g. âIdentifying informationâ means information tied to an 25 electronic device that identifies the userâs or ownerâs name, 26 address, phone number, email address, or other information that 27 would identify the owner or user of the electronic device. 28 h. âLocation informationâ means information concerning 29 the geographical location of an electronic device that, in 30 whole or in part, is generated, derived from, or obtained by 31 the operation of an electronic device or the operation of 32 a software application on an electronic device. âLocation 33 informationâ includes past, current, and future location 34 information. 35 -1- LSB 6911YC (1) 91 as/js 1/ 11 H.F. _____ i. âReverse-location informationâ means historical location 1 information for a defined time period, within a geographic 2 location, that affects a number of electronic devices for which 3 the identities of the owners or users of the electronic devices 4 are unknown to law enforcement. 5 2. a. For a criminal investigation or prosecution, a 6 law enforcement agency shall not obtain reverse-location 7 information for electronic devices within a geofence unless the 8 law enforcement agency obtains a search warrant as provided 9 under this section, the investigation or prosecution involves a 10 violent felony, and the law enforcement agency can demonstrate 11 an imminent, ongoing threat to public safety. 12 b. To obtain reverse-location information inside of a 13 geofence, a law enforcement agency shall include with the sworn 14 warrant application all of the following: 15 (1) A map or other visual depiction that represents the 16 geofence for which the warrant is seeking information. 17 (2) The following language at the beginning of the 18 application in a legible font no smaller than other text 19 appearing in the application: 20 NOTICE: This warrant application seeks judicial 21 authorization for the disclosure of reverse-location 22 information of electronic devices near the location of a 23 crime at or near the time of the crime. If authorized, the 24 warrant allows law enforcement to obtain historical location 25 information of all devices within the area described in the 26 warrant during the specified time from entities in possession 27 of the relevant data. The electronic devices captured in 28 the warrant may be owned or used by both alleged criminal 29 perpetrators and individuals not involved in the commission 30 of a crime. For this reason, any warrant issued must 31 require the anonymization of all devices associated with the 32 reverse-location information. 33 (3) Evidence establishing probable cause to believe that 34 evidence of a crime will be found within the geofence and 35 -2- LSB 6911YC (1) 91 as/js 2/ 11 H.F. _____ within a specified period of time. 1 c. If a court grants a warrant under this subsection, 2 the court shall require all electronic device data provided 3 pursuant to the warrant to be anonymized before the 4 reverse-location information is released to the law enforcement 5 agency. 6 d. A law enforcement agency obtaining reverse-location 7 information by placing a geofence around a public building 8 without obtaining a search warrant shall not be justified by 9 qualified immunity. 10 3. a. For a criminal investigation or prosecution, a 11 law enforcement agency shall not obtain reverse-location 12 information based on cell site records unless the law 13 enforcement agency obtains a search warrant as provided under 14 this section, the investigation or prosecution involves a 15 violent felony, and the law enforcement agency can demonstrate 16 an imminent, ongoing threat to public safety. 17 b. To obtain cell site-based reverse-location information, 18 a law enforcement agency shall include with the sworn warrant 19 application all of the following: 20 (1) A visual depiction or written description that 21 identifies: 22 (a) The crime scene location and any other areas of interest 23 related to the crime. 24 (b) The location of cell sites from which the 25 reverse-location information is sought. 26 (c) The distance between the crime scene location and the 27 cell sites from which the reverse-location information is 28 sought. 29 (2) The following language at the beginning of the 30 application in a legible font no smaller than other text 31 appearing in the application: 32 NOTICE: This warrant application seeks judicial 33 authorization for the disclosure of reverse-location 34 information of electronic devices near the location of a 35 -3- LSB 6911YC (1) 91 as/js 3/ 11 H.F. _____ crime at or near the time of the crime. If authorized, the 1 warrant allows law enforcement to obtain historical location 2 information of all devices within the area described in the 3 warrant during the specified time from entities in possession 4 of the relevant data. The electronic devices captured in 5 the warrant may be owned or used by both alleged criminal 6 perpetrators and individuals not involved in the commission 7 of a crime. For this reason, any warrant issued must 8 require the anonymization of all devices associated with the 9 reverse-location information. 10 (3) Evidence establishing probable cause to believe that 11 evidence of a crime will be found within the cell site records 12 and within a specified period of time. 13 c. If a court grants a warrant under this subsection, 14 the court shall require all electronic device data provided 15 pursuant to the warrant to be anonymized before the 16 reverse-location information is released to the law enforcement 17 agency. 18 4. a. If, after executing a warrant described in 19 subsection 2 or 3, a law enforcement agency seeks to obtain 20 reverse-location information beyond the parameters of the 21 warrant, the law enforcement agency shall do all of the 22 following: 23 (1) Include in the sworn warrant application the specific 24 electronic devices identified in the anonymized data for which 25 the law enforcement agency seeks additional reverse-location 26 information. 27 (2) Establish probable cause to believe that evidence of a 28 crime will be found within a specified period of time. 29 (3) Affirm that the crime described in subparagraph (2) 30 is the same crime or directly related to the crime that was 31 the subject of the warrant obtained under subsection 2 or 3, 32 or is a crime subject to the judicially recognized plain-view 33 exception to the warrant requirement. 34 b. If a court grants a warrant under this subsection, 35 -4- LSB 6911YC (1) 91 as/js 4/ 11 H.F. _____ the court shall require all electronic device data provided 1 pursuant to the warrant to be anonymized before the 2 reverse-location information is released to the law enforcement 3 agency. 4 5. To obtain identifying information for an electronic 5 device identified pursuant to a warrant obtained under 6 subsection 2, 3, or 4, a law enforcement agency shall establish 7 in the sworn warrant application probable cause to believe that 8 the electronic device was used or otherwise implicated in a 9 crime. 10 6. a. A law enforcement agency shall not use, copy, 11 or disclose, for any purpose, reverse-location information 12 obtained under a warrant under subsection 2, 3, or 4, that is 13 all of the following: 14 (1) Not related to the crime that is the subject of the 15 warrant. 16 (2) Collected as part of an effort to obtain the 17 reverse-location information of an electronic device that 18 is related to the crime that is the subject of the warrant 19 obtained under subsection 2, 3, or 4. 20 b. The law enforcement agency shall destroy in an 21 unrecoverable manner the reverse-location information described 22 in paragraph âaâ as soon as reasonably possible after the 23 criminal case is declined for prosecution or, if criminal 24 charges are filed, upon the final disposition of the criminal 25 case. 26 c. Reverse-location information obtained under subsection 2, 27 3, or 4 shall not be used in any of the following manners: 28 (1) Compared with, merged with, linked to, or in any way 29 electronically or otherwise connected to a source of electronic 30 data, including a database or file, containing one or more 31 points of data that includes the location information provided 32 by an electronic device unless all of the electronic data, 33 including the reverse-location information, is obtained for the 34 purpose of investigating the same criminal incident. 35 -5- LSB 6911YC (1) 91 as/js 5/ 11 H.F. _____ (2) Used in any other criminal investigation or 1 prosecution. 2 d. A person or entity that provides reverse-location 3 information under this section shall ensure that the 4 reverse-location information is anonymized before the 5 reverse-location information is provided to a law enforcement 6 agency. 7 7. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ or âcâ , a law 8 enforcement agency that executes a warrant under subsection 5 9 shall serve a notice described in subsection 3 on the owner of 10 the electronic device for which identifying information was 11 obtained as follows: 12 (1) Within ninety days after the day on which the 13 identifying information is obtained by the law enforcement 14 agency, but in no case more than three days after the day on 15 which the investigation is concluded. 16 (2) If the owner of the electronic device for which the 17 identifying information specified in the warrant is unknown to 18 the law enforcement agency, within ninety days after the day 19 on which the law enforcement agency identifies, or reasonably 20 could identify, the owner. 21 b. A law enforcement agency is not required to serve a 22 notice described in paragraph âaâ to the owner of the electronic 23 device for which identifying information was obtained if the 24 owner resides outside of the United States. 25 c. A law enforcement agency seeking a warrant in accordance 26 with subsection 5 may submit a request, and the court may grant 27 permission, to delay service of the notice required under 28 paragraph âaâ for a period not to exceed thirty days if the 29 court determines that there is reasonable cause to believe that 30 the notification may do any of the following: 31 (1) Endanger the life or physical safety of an individual. 32 (2) Cause a person to flee from prosecution. 33 (3) Lead to the destruction of or tampering with evidence. 34 (4) Intimidate a potential witness. 35 -6- LSB 6911YC (1) 91 as/js 6/ 11 H.F. _____ (5) Otherwise seriously jeopardize an investigation or 1 unduly delay a trial. 2 d. When a delay of notification is granted under paragraph 3 âcâ and upon application by the law enforcement agency, the 4 court may grant additional extensions of up to thirty days 5 each. 6 e. (1) A law enforcement agency that seeks a warrant 7 in accordance with subsection 5 may submit a request to the 8 court, and the court may grant permission, to delay service 9 of the notice required under paragraph âaâ if the purpose of 10 delaying the notification is to apprehend an individual who is 11 a fugitive from justice for whom an arrest warrant has been 12 issued for a forcible felony as defined in section 702.11. 13 (2) The court may grant the request to delay notification 14 until the individual who is a fugitive is apprehended by the 15 law enforcement agency. 16 f. The notice required under paragraph âaâ shall include all 17 of the following: 18 (1) A copy of the warrant. 19 (2) A written statement identifying the offense specified 20 in the warrant application, the identity of the law enforcement 21 agency that filed the application, the date on which the 22 location information or identifying information was obtained, 23 and the number and length of any authorized delays in 24 serving the notice required under paragraph âaâ including, if 25 applicable, the name of the court that authorized the delay and 26 a reference to the provision of this section that permitted the 27 delay. 28 g. A law enforcement agency shall serve the notice required 29 under paragraph âaâ to the owner of the electronic device by 30 personal service on the owner, by first class mail to the 31 ownerâs last known address, or by other reasonable means if the 32 ownerâs last known address is unknown. 33 8. Reverse-location information or identifying information 34 obtained in violation of the provisions of this section shall 35 -7- LSB 6911YC (1) 91 as/js 7/ 11 H.F. _____ be subject to the rules governing exclusion of evidence as if 1 the records were obtained in violation of the fourth amendment 2 to the Constitution of the United States and Article I, section 3 8, of the Constitution of the State of Iowa. 4 9. Beginning January 1, 2027, a law enforcement agency or 5 any government entity that obtained a reverse-location warrant 6 shall annually, on or before April 30, submit a report to the 7 general assembly with the following data for the previous 8 calendar year: 9 a. The number of reverse-location warrants requested by the 10 law enforcement agency under subsection 2, 3, or 4. 11 b. The number of investigations that used information 12 obtained under a reverse-location warrant to investigate a 13 crime that was not the subject of the reverse-location warrant. 14 c. The number of times identifying information for an 15 electronic device was obtained under subsection 5. 16 d. The number of electronic devices for which anonymized 17 electronic device data was obtained under each reverse-location 18 warrant described under subsection 2, paragraph âaâ . 19